Delaware, session 153, HB223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Part II, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Chapter 30R. MENSTRUAL DISORDERS Â§ 3001R. Menstrual disorders materials and information. (a) The Department, in conjunction with the Department of Education, must develop or obtain from a reputable organization written materials and information about menstrual disorders and their symptoms. The Department may publish physical copies of the materials and information, and must make electronic copies of the materials and information available on a website maintained by the Department or provide on such a website URLs, QR codes, or other electronic links to the materials and information that may be available to reach the target audience. (b) The materials and information developed or obtained under this section must be provided to school districts upon request. (c) Schools must post in any bathroom that may be used by a menstruating student and in student health centers a poster containing the URL to the website maintained by the Department where information about menstrual disorders can be found. Schools may also directly distribute the materials and information to students or provide students with flyers containing URLs, QR codes, or other links to the materials and information to educate students about menstrual disorders and their symptoms. (d) The Department must review the materials, information, and any electronic links to materials or information at least every 2 years to determine the effectiveness of the materials and information, ensure the materials and information are up-to-date and accurate, and confirm the continued validity of electronic links to materials and information and links contained therein. (e) The materials under this section must include at least the following: (1) The timing, signs, and symptoms of endometriosis and other menstrual disorders. (2) The importance of menstrual health and its potential impacts on an individualâs physical, emotional, social, and academic life. (3) Basic statistics on endometriosis and other menstrual disorders. (4) Best practices for individuals to be their own healthcare advocates. (5) Basic treatment options for endometriosis and other menstrual disorders, as well as recommendations for follow-up care from a health care provider. Section 2. This Act takes effect 120 days after its enactment into law.